North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 4. Sedimentation Pollution Control Act of 1973.

§ 113A-50.
Short title.

This Article shall be known as and may be cited as the “Sedimentation Pollution Control Act of 1973.”

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 1.

Cross References.

For requirements necessitated by temporary implementation of federal Phase II Stormwater Management and the Stormwater Management Rules, see notes under

G.S. 143-214.7

.

Express Review Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 11.4A(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may develop the Express Review Pilot Program, a pilot program to provide express permit and certification reviews. Participation in the Express Review Pilot Program is voluntary, and the program is to become supported by the fees determined pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall determine the project applications to review under the Express Review Pilot Program from those who request to participate in the Pilot Program. The Express Review Pilot Program may be applied to any one or all of the permits, approvals, or certifications in the following programs: the erosion and sedimentation control program, the coastal management program, and the water quality programs, including water quality certifications and stormwater management. The Express Review Pilot Program shall focus on the following permits or certifications:

“(1) Stormwater permits under Part 1 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“(2)
Stream origination certifications under Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“(3) Water quality certification under Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“(4) Erosion and sedimentation control permits under Article 4 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.

“(5) Permits under the Coastal Area Management Act (CAMA), Part 4 of Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.

“(b) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish up to eight positions to administer the Express Review Pilot Program and may determine the fees for express application review under the Pilot Program. Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-215.3

D, the maximum permit application fee to be charged under subsection (a) of this section for the express review of a project application requiring all of the permits under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500). Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-215.3

D, the maximum permit application fee to be charged for the express review of a project application requiring all of the permits under subdivisions (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500). Notwithstanding G.S. 143-215.3D, the maximum permit application fee charged for the express review of a project application for any other combination of permits under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000). Express review of a project application involving additional permits or certifications issued by the Department of Environment and Natural Resources other than those under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of this section may be allowed by the Department, and, notwithstanding G.S. 143-215.3D or any other statute or rule that sets a permit fee, the maximum permit application fee charged for the express review of a project application shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), plus one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the fee that would otherwise apply by statute or rule for that particular permit or certification. Additional fees, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the original permit application fee under this section, may be charged for subsequent reviews due to the insufficiency of the permit applications. The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish the procedure by which the amount of the fees under this subsection is determined, and the fees and procedures are not rules under G.S. 150B-2(8a) for the Express Review Pilot Program under this section.

“(c) The funds appropriated to the Department of Environment and Natural Resources in this act for the 2003-2004 fiscal year shall be used for the costs of implementing the Express Review Pilot Program under this section during the 2003-2004 fiscal year.

“(d) The Express Review Fund is created as a special nonreverting fund.
The Express Review Fund shall be used for the costs of implementing the Express Review Pilot Program under this section. All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the Express Review Fund. If the Express Review Pilot Program is abolished, the funds in the Express Review Fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

“(e) No later than May 1, 2004, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall report to the General Assembly its findings on the success of the Express Review Pilot Program and whether it recommends that the Pilot Program be continued or expanded.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 12.9(a)-(f) provides: “(a) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall continue the Express Review Pilot Program established by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284 that was implemented in the Wilmington and Raleigh regional offices and shall expand the Express Review Pilot Program to two additional regional offices within the Department, to be selected by the Department based on the Department’s determination of where the Pilot Program is most needed.

“(b) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall continue and support the eight positions that were authorized under Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284 to administer the expanded Express Review Pilot Program under this section. This expanded Program and these positions and support shall be funded from the Express Review Fund, created by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284.

“(c) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish and support four additional positions to administer the expanded Express Review Pilot Program under this section.
These positions and support may be funded for the 2004-2005 fiscal year from funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Environment and Natural Resources for this purpose. It is the intent of the General Assembly that these positions and support be funded in future fiscal years from the Express Review Fund.

“(d) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources may establish and support four additional positions to administer the expanded Express Review Pilot Program under this section.
These positions and support shall be funded from the Express Review Fund, created by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284.

“(e) No later than March 1, 2005, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall report to the Fiscal Research Division and the Environmental Review Commission its findings on the success of the continued Express Pilot Review Program and whether it recommends that the Program be continued or expanded and any other findings or recommendations, including any legislative proposals, that it deems pertinent.

“(f) Subsection (c) of this section becomes effective January 1, 2005.
The remaining subsections of this section become effective July 1, 2004.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 12.2(b), effective July 1, 2005, provides: “The Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall expand to a statewide program that operates in each regional office of the Department the Express Review Pilot Program established by Section 11.4A of S.L. 2003-284 and expanded by Section 12.9 of S.L. 2004-124, and the provisions of G.S. 143B-279.13, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, shall apply to this statewide program.”

For provisions of the Permit Extension Act of 2009, Session Laws 2009-406, see the notes under G.S. 153A-344.1 and G.S. 160A-385.1.

For provisions pertaining to extension of permits during state of economic emergency in the real estate sector, pursuant to Session Laws 2009-406, ss. 1 through 5.1, as amended by Session Laws 2009-484, s. 5.1, 2009-550, s. 5.2, 2009-572, ss. 1-3, and Session Laws 2010-177, s. 1, see notes appearing under this catchline at G.S. 160A-385.1.

§ 113A-51.
Preamble.

The sedimentation of streams, lakes and other waters of this State constitutes a major pollution problem. Sedimentation occurs from the erosion or depositing of soil and other materials into the waters, principally from construction sites and road maintenance. The continued development of this State will result in an intensification of pollution through sedimentation unless timely and appropriate action is taken. Control of erosion and sedimentation is deemed vital to the public interest and necessary to the public health and welfare, and expenditures of funds for erosion and sedimentation control programs shall be deemed for a public purpose. It is the purpose of this Article to provide for the creation, administration, and enforcement of a program and for the adoption of minimal mandatory standards which will permit development of this State to continue with the least detrimental effects from pollution by sedimentation. In recognition of the desirability of early coordination of sedimentation control planning, it is the intention of the General Assembly that preconstruction conferences be held among the affected parties, subject to the availability of staff.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 2; 1975, c. 647, s. 3.

§ 113A-52.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1417, s. 1.

(1a)

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12(b)-2 (1 June 1993 Edition), which defines “affiliate” as a person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control of another person.

“Commission” means the North Carolina Sedimentation Control Commission.

“Department” means the North Carolina Department of Environmental Quality.

“District” means any Soil and Water Conservation District created pursuant to Chapter 139, North Carolina General Statutes.

“Erosion” means the wearing away of land surface by the action of wind, water, gravity, or any combination thereof.

“Land-disturbing activity” means any use of the land by any person in residential, industrial, educational, institutional or commercial development, highway and road construction and maintenance that results in a change in the natural cover or topography and that may cause or contribute to sedimentation.

“Local government” means any county, incorporated village, town, or city, or any combination of counties, incorporated villages, towns, and cities, acting through a joint program pursuant to the provisions of this Article.

(7a)

“Parent” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12(b)-2 (1 June 1993 Edition), which defines “parent” as an affiliate that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls another person.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, public or private corporation, trust, estate, commission, board, public or private institution, utility, cooperative, interstate body, or other legal entity.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Environmental Quality.

“Sediment” means solid particulate matter, both mineral and organic, that has been or is being transported by water, air, gravity, or ice from its site of origin.

(10a)

“Subsidiary” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12(b)-2 (1 June 1993 Edition), which defines “subsidiary” as an affiliate that is directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controlled by another person.

(10b)

“Tract” means all contiguous land and bodies of water being disturbed or to be disturbed as a unit, regardless of ownership.

“Working days” means days exclusive of Saturday and Sunday during which weather conditions or soil conditions permit land-disturbing activity to be undertaken.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 3; c. 1417, s. 1; 1975, c. 647, s. 1; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 179, s. 1; c. 727, s. 218(60); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 19(b); 1991, c. 275, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 776, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v).

§ 113A-52.01.
Applicability of this Article.

This Article shall not apply to the following land-disturbing activities:

Activities, including the production and activities relating or incidental to the production of crops, grains, fruits, vegetables, ornamental and flowering plants, dairy, livestock, poultry, and all other forms of agriculture undertaken on agricultural land for the production of plants and animals useful to man, including, but not limited to:

Forages and sod crops, grains and feed crops, tobacco, cotton, and peanuts.

Dairy animals and dairy products.

Poultry and poultry products.

Livestock, including beef cattle, llamas, sheep, swine, horses, ponies, mules, and goats.

Bees and apiary products.

Fur producing animals.

Mulch, ornamental plants, and other horticultural products. For purposes of this section, “mulch” means substances composed primarily of plant remains or mixtures of such substances.

Activities undertaken on forestland for the production and harvesting of timber and timber products and conducted in accordance with standards defined by the Forest Practice Guidelines Related to Water Quality, as adopted by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Activities for which a permit is required under the Mining Act of 1971, Article 7 of Chapter 74 of the General Statutes.

For the duration of an emergency, activities essential to protect human life, including activities specified in an executive order issued under G.S. 166A-19.30(a)(5).

Activities undertaken to restore the wetland functions of converted wetlands to provide compensatory mitigation to offset impacts permitted under Section 404 of the Clean Water Act.

Activities undertaken pursuant to Natural Resources Conservation Service standards to restore the wetlands functions of converted wetlands as defined in Title 7 Code of Federal Regulations § 12.2 (January 1, 2014 Edition).

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 776, s. 2; 1997-84, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 14.7(k); 2015-263, s. 19; 2016-113, s. 14; 2017-108, s. 6(a).

§ 113A-52.1.
Forest Practice Guidelines.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall adopt Forest Practice Guidelines Related to Water Quality (best management practices). The adoption of Forest Practices Guidelines Related to Water Quality under this section is subject to the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

If land-disturbing activity undertaken on forestland for the production and harvesting of timber and timber products is not conducted in accordance with Forest Practice Guidelines Related to Water Quality, the provisions of this Article shall apply to such activity and any related land-disturbing activity on the tract.

The Commissioner shall establish and appoint a Forestry Technical Advisory Committee to assist in the development and periodic review of Forest Practice Guidelines Related to Water Quality. The Forestry Technical Advisory Committee shall consist of one member from the forest products industry, one member who is a consulting forester, one member who is a private landowner knowledgeable in forestry, one member from the United States Forest Service, one member from the academic community who is knowledgeable in forestry, one member employed by the Department of Environmental Quality who is knowledgeable in erosion and sedimentation control, one member who is knowledgeable in wildlife management, one member who is knowledgeable in marine fisheries management, one member who is knowledgeable in water quality, and one member from the conservation community.

History.

1989, c. 179, s. 2; 2017-108, s. 6(b).

§ 113A-53.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 41.

Cross References.

For this section as amended by Session Laws 1973, c. 1417, s. 2, see the note to G.S. 143B-299.

As to creation and organization of the Sedimentation Control Commission, see G.S. 143B-298, 143B-299.

§ 113A-54.
Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall, in cooperation with the Secretary of Transportation and other appropriate State and federal agencies, develop, promulgate, publicize, and administer a comprehensive State erosion and sedimentation control program.

The Commission shall develop and adopt and shall revise as necessary from time to time, rules and regulations for the control of erosion and sedimentation resulting from land-disturbing activities. The Commission shall adopt or revise its rules and regulations in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to

G.S. 113A-54(b)

for carrying out the erosion and sedimentation control program shall:

Be based upon relevant physical and developmental information concerning the watershed and drainage basins of the State, including, but not limited to, data relating to land use, soils, hydrology, geology, grading, ground cover, size of land area being disturbed, proximate water bodies and their characteristics, transportation, and public facilities and services;

Include such survey of lands and waters as may be deemed appropriate by the Commission or required by any applicable laws to identify those areas, including multijurisdictional and watershed areas, with critical erosion and sedimentation problems; and

Contain conservation standards for various types of soils and land uses, which standards shall include criteria and alternative techniques and methods for the control of erosion and sedimentation resulting from land-disturbing activities.

In implementing the erosion and sedimentation control program, the Commission shall:

Assist and encourage local governments in developing erosion and sedimentation control programs and, as a part of this assistance, the Commission shall develop a model local erosion and sedimentation control ordinance. The Commission shall approve, approve as modified, or disapprove local programs submitted to it pursuant to

G.S. 113A-60

.

Assist and encourage other State agencies in developing erosion and sedimentation control programs to be administered in their jurisdictions. The Commission shall approve, approve as modified, or disapprove programs submitted pursuant to

G.S. 113A-56

and from time to time shall review these programs for compliance with rules adopted by the Commission and for adequate enforcement.

Develop recommended methods of control of sedimentation and prepare and make available for distribution publications and other materials dealing with sedimentation control techniques appropriate for use by persons engaged in land-disturbing activities, general educational materials on erosion and sedimentation control, and instructional materials for persons involved in the enforcement of this Article and erosion and sedimentation control rules, ordinances, regulations, and plans.

Require submission of erosion and sedimentation control plans by those responsible for initiating land-disturbing activities for approval prior to commencement of the activities.

To assist it in developing the erosion and sedimentation control program required by this Article, the Commission is authorized to appoint an advisory committee consisting of technical experts in the fields of water resources, soil science, engineering, and landscape architecture.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 10, effective August 13, 1987.

The Commission is authorized to make the final decision on a request for the remission of a civil penalty under

G.S. 113A-64.2

.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 5; c. 1331, s. 3; c. 1417, s. 6; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 74; 1977, c. 464, s. 35; 1979, c. 922, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1014, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 10; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1000, s. 3; 1989, c. 676, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 776, s. 3; 2002-165, ss. 2.2, 2.3; 2015-241, s. 14.26(a).

§ 113A-54.1.
Approval of erosion control plans.

A draft erosion and sedimentation control plan must contain the applicant’s address and, if the applicant is not a resident of North Carolina, designate a North Carolina agent for the purpose of receiving notice from the Commission or the Secretary of compliance or noncompliance with the plan, this Article, or any rules adopted pursuant to this Article. Except as provided in subsection (a1) of this section, if the applicant is not the owner of the land to be disturbed, the draft erosion and sedimentation control plan must include the owner’s written consent for the applicant to submit a draft erosion and sedimentation control plan and to conduct the anticipated land-disturbing activity. The Commission shall approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove a draft erosion and sedimentation control plan for those land-disturbing activities for which prior plan approval is required within 30 days of receipt. The Commission shall condition approval of a draft erosion and sedimentation control plan upon the applicant’s compliance with federal and State water quality laws, regulations, and rules. Failure to approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove a completed draft erosion and sedimentation control plan within 30 days of receipt shall be deemed approval of the plan. If the Commission disapproves a draft erosion and sedimentation control plan or a revised erosion and sedimentation control plan, it must state in writing the specific reasons that the plan was disapproved. Failure to approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove a revised erosion and sedimentation control plan within 15 days of receipt shall be deemed approval of the plan. The Commission may establish an expiration date for erosion and sedimentation control plans approved under this Article.

(a1)

If the applicant is not the owner of the land to be disturbed and the anticipated land-disturbing activity involves the construction of utility lines for the provision of water, sewer, gas, telecommunications, or electrical service, the draft erosion and sedimentation control plan may be submitted without the written consent of the owner of the land, so long as the owner of the land has been provided prior notice of the project.

If, following commencement of a land-disturbing activity pursuant to an approved erosion and sedimentation control plan, the Commission determines that the plan is inadequate to meet the requirements of this Article, the Commission may require any revision of the plan that is necessary to comply with this Article. Failure to approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove a revised erosion and sedimentation control plan within 15 days of receipt shall be deemed approval of the plan.

The Commission shall disapprove an erosion and sedimentation control plan if implementation of the plan would result in a violation of rules adopted by the Environmental Management Commission to protect riparian buffers along surface waters. The Director of the Division of Energy, Mineral, and Land Resources may disapprove an erosion and sedimentation control plan or disapprove a transfer of a plan under subsection (d1) of this section upon finding that an applicant or a parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant:

Is conducting or has conducted land-disturbing activity without an approved plan, or has received notice of violation of a plan previously approved by the Commission or a local government pursuant to this Article and has not complied with the notice within the time specified in the notice;

Has failed to pay a civil penalty assessed pursuant to this Article or a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this Article by the time the payment is due;

Has been convicted of a misdemeanor pursuant to G.S. 113A-64(b) or any criminal provision of a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this Article; or

Has failed to substantially comply with State rules or local ordinances and regulations adopted pursuant to this Article.

In the event that an erosion and sedimentation control plan or a transfer of a plan is disapproved by the Director pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the Director shall state in writing the specific reasons that the plan was disapproved. The applicant or the proposed transferee may appeal the Director’s disapproval of the plan to the Commission. For purposes of this subsection and subsection (c) of this section, an applicant’s record or a proposed transferee’s record may be considered for only the two years prior to the application date.

(d1)

The Department may transfer an erosion and sedimentation control plan approved pursuant to this section without the consent of the plan holder to a successor-owner of the property on which the permitted activity is occurring or will occur as provided in this subsection:

The Department may transfer a plan if all of the following conditions are met:

The successor-owner of the property submits to the Department a written request for the transfer of the plan and an authorized statement of financial responsibility and ownership.

The Department finds all of the following:

The plan holder is one of the following:

A natural person who is deceased.

A partnership, limited liability corporation, corporation, or any other business association that has been dissolved.

A person who has been lawfully and finally divested of title to the property on which the permitted activity is occurring or will occur.

A person who has sold the property on which the permitted activity is occurring or will occur.

The successor-owner holds title to the property on which the permitted activity is occurring or will occur.

The successor-owner is the sole claimant of the right to engage in the permitted activity.

There will be no substantial change in the permitted activity.

(2)

The plan holder shall comply with all terms and conditions of the plan until such time as the plan is transferred.

(3)

The successor-owner shall comply with all terms and conditions of the plan once the plan has been transferred.

(4)

Notwithstanding changes to law made after the original issuance of the plan, the Department may not impose new or different terms and conditions in the plan without the prior express consent of the successor-owner. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the Commission from requiring a revised plan pursuant to G.S. 113A-54.1(b).

The landowner, the financially responsible party, or the landowner’s or the financially responsible party’s agent shall perform an inspection of the area covered by the plan after each phase of the plan has been completed and after establishment of temporary ground cover in accordance with G.S. 113A-57(2). The person who performs the inspection shall maintain and make available a record of the inspection at the site of the land-disturbing activity. The record shall set out any significant deviation from the approved erosion control plan, identify any measures that may be required to correct the deviation, and document the completion of those measures. The record shall be maintained until permanent ground cover has been established as required by the approved erosion and sedimentation control plan. The inspections required by this subsection shall be in addition to inspections required by

G.S. 113A-61.1

.

For land-disturbing activities on a single-family residential lot involving new construction with land disturbance of less than one acre where the builder or developer is the owner of the lot being developed and the person financially responsible for the land-disturbing activity, the financial responsibility for land-disturbing activity on that lot transfers to the new owner upon the builder’s or developer’s conveyance of the lot to the new owner, recording of the deed in the office of the register of deeds, and notification to the office or local program that approved the erosion control plan.

History.

1989, c. 676, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 776, s. 4; 1998-221, s. 1.11(a); 1999-379, s. 1; 2005-386, s. 7.1; 2006-250, s. 1; 2011-394, s. 3; 2012-143, s. 1(f); 2013-121, s. 3; 2021-121, s. 5(a).

§ 113A-54.2.
Approval Fees.

An application and compliance fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per acre of disturbed land shown on an erosion and sedimentation control plan or of land actually disturbed during the life of the project shall be charged for the review of an erosion and sedimentation control plan and related compliance activities under this Article.

The Sedimentation Account is established as a nonreverting account within the Department. Fees collected under this section shall be credited to the Account and shall be applied to the costs of administering this Article.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 3.

G.S. 113A-60

governs the authority of local programs approved pursuant to this Article to assess fees for the review of erosion and sedimentation control plans.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 906, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 776, s. 5; 1999-379, s. 5; 2002-165, s. 2.4; 2007-323, s. 30.1(a); 2021-121, s. 5(b); 2021-180, s. 12.10A(a).

§ 113A-55.
Authority of the Secretary.

The sedimentation control program developed by the Commission shall be administered by the Secretary under the direction of the Commission. To this end the Secretary shall employ the necessary clerical, technical, and administrative personnel, and assign tasks to the various divisions of the Department for the purpose of implementing this Article. The Secretary may bring enforcement actions pursuant to

G.S. 113A-64

and

G.S. 113A-65

. The Secretary shall make final agency decisions in contested cases that arise from civil penalty assessments pursuant to

G.S. 113A-64

.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 6; c. 1417, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 776, s. 6.

§ 113A-56.
Jurisdiction of the Commission.

The Commission shall have jurisdiction, to the exclusion of local governments, to adopt rules concerning land-disturbing activities that are:

Conducted by the State.

Conducted by the United States.

Conducted by persons having the power of eminent domain other than a local government.

Conducted by a local government.

Funded in whole or in part by the State or the United States.

The Commission may delegate the jurisdiction conferred by G.S. 113A-56(a), in whole or in part, to any other State agency that has submitted an erosion and sedimentation control program to be administered by it, if the program has been approved by the Commission as being in conformity with the general State program.

The Commission shall have concurrent jurisdiction with local governments that administer a delegated erosion and sedimentation control program over all other land-disturbing activities. In addition to the authority granted to the Commission in

G.S. 113A-60(c)

, the Commission has the following authority with respect to a delegated erosion and sedimentation control program:

To review erosion and sedimentation control plan approvals made by a delegated erosion and sedimentation control program and to require a revised plan if the Commission determines that a plan does not comply with the requirements of this Article or the rules adopted pursuant to this Article.

To review the compliance activities of a delegated erosion and sedimentation control program and to take appropriate compliance action if the Commission determines that the local government has failed to take appropriate compliance action.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 7; c. 1417, s. 4; 1987, c. 827, s. 130; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1000, s. 4; 2002-165, s. 2.5; 2006-250, s. 2.

Local Modification.

City of Raleigh: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1043, s. 1.

§ 113A-57.
Mandatory standards for land-disturbing activity.

No land-disturbing activity subject to this Article shall be undertaken except in accordance with the following mandatory requirements:

No land-disturbing activity during periods of construction or improvement to land shall be permitted in proximity to a lake or natural watercourse unless a buffer zone is provided along the margin of the watercourse of sufficient width to confine visible siltation within the twenty-five percent (25%) of the buffer zone nearest the land-disturbing activity. Waters that have been classified as trout waters by the Environmental Management Commission shall have an undisturbed buffer zone 25 feet wide or of sufficient width to confine visible siltation within the twenty-five percent (25%) of the buffer zone nearest the land-disturbing activity, whichever is greater. Provided, however, that the Sedimentation Control Commission may approve plans which include land-disturbing activity along trout waters when the duration of said disturbance would be temporary and the extent of said disturbance would be minimal. This subdivision shall not apply to a land-disturbing activity in connection with the construction of facilities to be located on, over, or under a lake or natural watercourse.

The angle for graded slopes and fills shall be no greater than the angle that can be retained by vegetative cover or other adequate erosion-control devices or structures. In any event, slopes left exposed will, within 21 calendar days of completion of any phase of grading, be planted or otherwise provided with temporary or permanent ground cover, devices, or structures sufficient to restrain erosion.

Whenever land-disturbing activity that will disturb more than one acre is undertaken on a tract, the person conducting the land-disturbing activity shall install erosion and sedimentation control devices and practices that are sufficient to retain the sediment generated by the land-disturbing activity within the boundaries of the tract during construction upon and development of the tract, and shall plant or otherwise provide a permanent ground cover sufficient to restrain erosion after completion of construction or development within a time period to be specified by rule of the Commission.

No person shall initiate any land-disturbing activity that will disturb more than one acre on a tract unless, 30 or more days prior to initiating the activity, an erosion and sedimentation control plan for the activity is filed with the agency having jurisdiction and approved by the agency. An erosion and sedimentation control plan may be filed less than 30 days prior to initiation of a land-disturbing activity if the plan is submitted under an approved express permit program, and the land-disturbing activity may be initiated and conducted in accordance with the plan once the plan has been approved. The agency having jurisdiction shall forward to the Director of the Division of Water Resources a copy of each erosion and sedimentation control plan for a land-disturbing activity that involves the utilization of ditches for the purpose of de-watering or lowering the water table of the tract.

The land-disturbing activity shall be conducted in accordance with the approved erosion and sedimentation control plan.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 8; c. 1417, s. 5; 1975, c. 647, s. 2; 1979, c. 564; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1014, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 131; 1989, c. 676, s. 3; 1991, c. 275, s. 2; 1998-99, s. 1; 1999-379, s. 2; 2002-165, s. 2.6; 2005-386, s. 7.2; 2005-443, s. 2; 2006-255, s. 2; 2006-264, s. 53(a); 2013-413, s. 57(f).

§ 113A-58.
Enforcement authority of the Commission.

In implementing the provisions of this Article the Commission is authorized and directed to:

Inspect or cause to be inspected the sites of land-disturbing activities to determine whether applicable laws, regulations or erosion and sedimentation control plans are being complied with;

Make requests, or delegate to the Secretary authority to make requests, of the Attorney General or solicitors for prosecutions of violations of this Article.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 9; 2002-165, s. 2.7.

§ 113A-59.
Educational activities.

The Commission in conjunction with the soil and water conservation districts, the North Carolina Agricultural Extension Service, and other appropriate State and federal agencies shall conduct educational programs in erosion and sedimentation control, such programs to be directed towards State and local governmental officials, persons engaged in land-disturbing activities, and interested citizen groups.

History.

1973, c. 392, s. 10.